Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1078.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6bb. (1) An electric utility or natural gas utility shall file a report with the commission every year that contains all of the following for that reporting period: (a) A list of contributions to a separate segregated fund established by that utility. (b) An itemized list of contributions that a separate segregated fund established by the utility made to, and expenditures that the separate segregated fund made on behalf of, any of the following: (i) Candidate committees. (ii) Ballot question committees. (iii) Political party committees. (iv) Political committees. (v) Independent expenditure committees. (vi) Independent committees. (vii) Other separate segregated funds. (c) Any money given to an organization formed under 26 USC 501(c)(4) or 26 USC 501(c)(6), including the amount given and the name of that organization. (d) Any money given to an organization formed under 26 USC 527, including the amount given and the name of that organization. (e) Any expenditures made on lobbying. (f) A list of any contributions or expenditures described in subdivisions (a) to (e) that were made by the parent company or an affiliate of the electric utility or natural gas utility. (2) The commission shall post a report received under subsection (1) on its website. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Ballot question committee" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.202. (b) "Candidate committee" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.203. (c) "Contribution" means that term as defined in section 4 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.204. (d) "Independent committee" means that term as defined in section 8 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.208. (e) "Independent expenditure committee" means that term as defined in section 9 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.209. (f) "Lobbying" means that term as defined in section 5 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.415. (g) "Political committee" means that term as defined in section 11 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.211. (h) "Political party committee" means that term as defined in section 11 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.211.